Florida, session 2026, HB4027.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Findings of fact.—The Legislature finds that
the Superintendent of Schools for Hillsborough County Public
Schools was changed from an elected position to an appointed
position pursuant to a referendum held during the November 8,
1966 general election in accordance with Section 2B, Article XII
of the State Constitution of 1885.
Section 2. Transition to elected superintendent.—Pursuant
to Section 5, Article IX and Section 5, Article XII of the State
Constitution, the Superintendent of Schools for Hillsborough
County Public Schools shall be elected in a partisan election to
a term of 4 years by vote of the qualified electors residing in
Hillsborough County, beginning with the general election in
2028.
Section 3. Referendum election.—
(1) As required by Section 5, Article IX of the State
Constitution, during the 2026 general election, there shall be
held a referendum election concerning whether section 2 shall
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4027 -00-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
HB 4027 2026 Legislature
become a law.
(2) The ballot title for the referendum question shall be
in substantially the following form:

PROVIDING FOR AN ELECTED, RATHER THAN AN APPOINTED,
SUPERINTENDENT OF SCHOOLS

(3) The referendum question shall be placed on the ballot
in substantially the following form:
Shall Chapter 2026- , Laws of Florida, which provides that the
Superintendent of Schools for Hillsborough County Public Schools
shall no longer be appointed by the School Board, but shall be
elected in a partisan election for a term of 4 years, beginning
with the 2028 general election, become effective?
( ) Yes.
( ) No.
(4) The referendum election shall be conducted by the
Supervisor of Elections of Hillsborough County in accordance
with the Florida Election Code.
Section 4. This act shall take effect upon becoming a law,
except that section 2 shall take effect only upon approval by a
majority vote of those qualified electors of Hillsborough County
voting in a referendum to be held in conjunction with the 2026
general election.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4027 -00-er